ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей на траве и лакросс > Тренировочный инвентарь для хоккея на траве: Вратарский тренировочный инвентарь для хоккея на траве; Средства для улучшения хвата клюшки для хоккея на траве; Тренажеры-стенки для хоккея на траве; Мишени для отработки бросков по воротам для хоккея на траве; Рюкзаки для тренировок по хоккею на траве; Тренировочные мячи для хоккея на траве; Тренировочные коврики для хоккея на траве
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Field Hockey & Lacrosse > Field Hockey Training Aids: Field Hockey Goalkeeper Training Aids; Field Hockey Grip Enhancers; Field Hockey Rebound Boards; Field Hockey Shooting Targets; Field Hockey Training Backpacks; Field Hockey Training Balls; Field Hockey Training Mats
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Хокей на трева и лакрос > Помощни средства за тренировка по хокей на трева: Помощни средства за тренировка на вратари по хокей на трева; Продукти за подобряване на захвата на стик за хокей на трева; Табли за рикошет за хокей на трева; Мишени за хокей на трева; Раници за тренировки по хокей на трева; Тренировъчни топки за хокей; Тренировъчни подложки за хокей
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Hokej na travi in lacrosse > Pripomočki za vadbo hokeja na travi: Pripomočki za vadbo vratarjev hokeja na travi; Pripomočki za izboljšanje oprijema za hokej na travi; Odbojne deske za hokej na travi; Tarče za hokej na travi; Nahrbtniki za vadbo hokeja na travi; Hokej na travi Žoge za vadbo; Hokej na travi Blazine za vadbo
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Feldhockey & Lacrosse > Feldhockey-Trainingshilfen: Trainingshilfen für Feldhockey-Torwarte; Feldhockey-Griffverstärker; Feldhockey-Rückprallwände; Feldhockey-Zielscheiben; Feldhockey-Trainingstaschen; Feldhockey-Trainingsbälle; Feldhockey-Trainingsmatten
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Hóquei de campo e lacrosse > Auxílios de treinamento para hóquei em campo: Auxílios de treinamento para goleiros de hóquei em campo; Melhoradores de aderência para hóquei em campo; Placas de rebote para hóquei em campo; Alvos de tiro para hóquei em campo; Mochilas de treinamento para hóquei em campo; Bolas de treinamento de hóquei em campo; Tapetes de treinamento de hóquei em campo
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Hockey su prato e lacrosse > Ausili per l'allenamento dell'hockey su prato: Ausili per l'allenamento dei portieri di hockey su prato; Miglioratori della presa per hockey su prato; Tavole da rimbalzo per hockey su prato; Bersagli da tiro per hockey su prato; Zaini da allenamento per hockey su prato; Palline da allenamento per hockey su prato; Tappetini da allenamento per hockey su prato
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Lacrosse og udendørs hockey > Hjælpemidler til træning i hockey: Hjælpemidler til træning af hockeymålmand; Forbedringer til hockeygreb; Rebound-kanter til hockey; Skydemål til hockey; Hockeytræningsrygsække; Træningsbolde til landhockey; Træningsmåtter til landhockey
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Gyeplabda és lacrosse > Gyeplabda-edzéssegédek: Gyeplabda-kapusedzéssegédek; Gyeplabda-markolatfokozók; Gyeplabda-visszapattanótáblák; Gyeplabda-lövőcélok; Gyeplabda-edzéshátizsákok; Gyeplabda edzőlabdák; Gyeplabda edzőszőnyegek
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Žolės riedulys ir lakrosas > Žolės riedulio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Žolės riedulio vartininkų treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Žolės riedulio sukibimą gerinančio priemonės; Žolės riedulio atšokimo lentos; Žolės riedulio smūgiavimo taikiniai; Žolės riedulio treniruočių kuprinės; Žolės riedulio treniruočių kamuoliai; Žolės riedulio treniruočių kilimėliai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Çim Hokeyi ve Lakros > Çim Hokeyi Eğitim Araçları: Çim Hokeyi Kaleci Eğitim Araçları; Çim Hokeyi Kavrama Arttırıcıları; Çim Hokeyi Ribaund Tahtaları; Çim Hokeyi Atış Hedefleri; Çim Hokeyi Antrenman Sırt Çantaları; Çim hokeyi antrenman topları; Çim hokeyi antrenman matları
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Hockey en lacrosse > Veldhockeytrainingshulpmiddelen: Veldhockeykeepertrainingshulpmiddelen; Veldhockeygripversterkers; Veldhockeyreboundborden; Veldhockeyschietdoelwitten; Veldhockeytrainingsrugzakken; Trainingsballen voor veldhockey; Trainingsmatten voor veldhockey
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Hochei pe iarbă și lacrosse > Articole antrenament pentru hochei pe iarbă: Articole antrenament portar pentru hochei pe iarbă; Articole priză pentru hochei pe iarbă; Plăci ricoșeu pentru hochei pe iarbă; Ținte pentru hochei pe iarbă; Rucsacuri de antrenament pentru hochei pe iarbă; Mingi de antrenament pentru hochei pe iarbă; Covorașe de antrenament pentru hochei pe iarbă
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Landhockey og Lacrosse > Treningshjelpemidler for landhockey: Treningshjelpemidler for landhockeykeepere; Grepstrening for landhockey; Tilbakeslagsbrett for landhockey; Skyteskiver for landhockey; Treningsryggsekker for landhockey; Treningsballer for landhockey; Treningsmatter for landhockey
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Pozemní hokej a lakros > Tréninkové pomůcky pro pozemní hokej: Tréninkové pomůcky pro brankáře pozemního hokeje; Gripové pásky pro pozemní hokej; Odrážecí trenažéry na trénink pozemního hokeje; Střelecké cíle pro pozemní hokej; Batohy na trénink pozemního hokeje; Tréninkové míčky na pozemní hokej; Tréninkové podložky na pozemní hokej
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 草地曲棍球/袋棍球 > 曲棍球訓練輔助工具: 曲棍球守門員訓練輔助工具; 曲棍球握力增強器; 曲棍球練習板; 曲棍球射球練習靶; 曲棍球訓練背包; 曲棍球訓練球; 曲棍球訓練墊
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Pozemný hokej a lakros > Tréningové pomôcky pre pozemný hokej: Tréningové pomôcky pre brankárov pozemného hokeja; Koncovky na hokejku pozemného hokeja; Odrazové dosky pre pozemný hokej; Strelecké terče pre pozemný hokej; Tréningové batohy pre pozemný hokej; Tréningové loptičky pre pozemný hokej; Tréningové podložky pre pozemný hokej
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 陆上曲棍球/长曲棍球 > 曲棍球训练辅助用品: 曲棍球守门员训练辅助用品; 曲棍球握力增强器; 曲棍球反弹板; 曲棍球击球靶; 曲棍球训练背包; 曲棍球训练球; 曲棍球训练垫
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Landhockey och lacrosse > Träningshjälpmedel för landhockey: Målvaktsträningshjälpmedel för landhockey; Greppförstärkare för landhockey; Returskivor för landhockey; Skottmål för landhockey; Träningsryggsäckar för landhockey; Träningsbollar för landhockey; Träningsmattor för landhockey
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Hockey sur gazon et lacrosse > Aides à l'entraînement au hockey sur gazon: Aides à l'entraînement des gardiens de but de hockey sur gazon; Améliorateurs d'adhérence pour le hockey sur gazon; Planches de rebond pour hockey sur gazon; Cibles de tir pour hockey sur gazon; Sacs à dos d'entraînement pour hockey sur gazon; Balles d'entraînement de hockey sur gazon; Tapis d'entraînement de hockey sur gazon
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 필드하키/라크로스 > 필드하키 훈련 장비: 필드하키 골키퍼 훈련 장비; 필드하키 그립 개선 용품; 필드하키 리바운드 보드; 필드하키 슈팅 타겟; 필드하키 트레이닝 배낭; 필드 하키 훈련용 공; 필드 하키 훈련 매트
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฮอกกี้บนพื้นหญ้าและลาครอส > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมฮอกกี้สนาม: อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมผู้รักษาประตูสำหรับกีฬาฮอกกี้สนาม; อุปกรณ์เพิ่มประสิทธิภาพการจับในกีฬาฮอกกี้สนาม; กระดานเด้งลูกฮอกกี้สนาม; เป้าหมายการยิงฮอกกี้สนาม; เป้สะพายหลังสำหรับฝึกซ้อมฮอกกี้สนาม; ลูกซ้อมฟิลด์ฮอกกี้; เสื่อซ้อมฟิลด์ฮอกกี้
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Maahockey ja lacrosse > Maahockeyn-harjoitteluvälineet: Maahockeymaalivahdin harjoitteluvälineet; Maahockeyn oteharjoittimet; Maahockeyn palautuslaudat; Maahockeyn maalitaulut; Maahockeyn harjoittelureput; Maahockeyn harjoituspallot; Maahockeyn harjoitusmatot
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Hockey sobre hierba y lacrosse > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de hockey sobre hierba: Ayudas para el entrenamiento de porteros de hockey sobre hierba; Potenciadores de agarre de hockey sobre hierba; Tablas de rebote de hockey sobre hierba; Dianas de tiro para hockey sobre hierba; Mochilas de entrenamiento de hockey sobre hierba; Pelotas de entrenamiento de hockey sobre césped; Colchonetas de entrenamiento para hockey sobre césped
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Hokej na travi i lacrosse > Oprema za trening hokeja na travi: Oprema za vratara u hokeju na travi; Sredstva za bolje prianjanje za hokej na travi; Odbijajuće ploče za hokej na travi; Mete za hokej na travi; Ruksaci za trening hokeja na travi; Lopte za vježbanje za hokej na travi; Prostirke za vježbanje za hokej na travi
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Lacrosse e hóquei em campo > Auxiliares de treino para hóquei em campo: Auxiliares de treino de guarda-redes para hóquei em campo; Reforço de aderência para hóquei em campo; Placas de ressalto para hóquei em campo; Alvos de lançamento para hóquei em campo; Mochilas de treino para hóquei em campo; Bolas de treino de hóquei em campo; Tapetes de treino de hóquei em campo
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Χόκεϊ επί χόρτου & λακρός > Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα χόκεϊ επί χόρτου: Βοηθήματα εκπαίδευσης τερματοφυλάκων χόκεϊ; Ενισχυτικά λαβής χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Σανίδες αναπήδησης χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Στόχοι βολών χόκεϊ; Σακίδια προπόνησης χόκεϊ; Μπάλες προπόνησης χόκεϊ επί χόρτου; Στρώματα προπόνησης χόκεϊ επί χόρτου
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Khúc côn cầu trên cỏ và bóng vợt > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện khúc côn cầu trên sân cỏ: Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện thủ môn khúc côn cầu trên sân cỏ; Dây tăng cường độ bám cầm gậy khúc côn cầu trên sân cỏ; Ván bật lại tập luyện khúc côn cầu trên sân cỏ; Bia mục tiêu đánh cầu khúc côn cầu trên sân cỏ; Ba lô đựng đồ tập luyện khúc côn cầu trên sân cỏ; Bóng tập khúc côn cầu trên cỏ; Thảm tập khúc côn cầu trên cỏ
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィールドホッケー・ラクロス用品 > フィールドホッケー練習器具: フィールドホッケーゴールキーパー練習器具; フィールドホッケー用グリップエンハンサー; フィールドホッケー用リバウンドボード; フィールドホッケー用シュートターゲット; フィールドホッケー用トレーニングバックパック; フィールドホッケー用トレーニングボール; フィールドホッケー用トレーニングマット
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Hokej na trawie i lacrosse > Pomoce treningowe do hokeja na trawie: Pomoce treningowe dla bramkarzy hokeja na trawie; Wzmacniacze chwytu do hokeja na trawie; Tablice treningowe do hokeja na trawie; Cele do hokeja na trawie; Plecaki treningowe do hokeja na trawie; Piłki treningowe do hokeja na trawie; Maty treningowe do hokeja na trawie